Utah statutes.
13-41-202.   Enforcement -- Penalty.

(1)  The division shall enforce this chapter.

(2)  In determining whether to impose penalties against a person who violates this chapter, the division shall consider:

(a)  the person's cost of doing business not accounted for in the cost to the person of the good or service, including costs associated with a decrease in the supply available to a person who relies on a high volume of sales;

(b)  the person's efforts to comply with this chapter;

(c)  whether the average price charged by the person during the 30-day period immediately preceding the day on which the state of emergency is declared is artificially deflated because the good or service was on sale for a lower price than the person customarily charges for the good or service; and

(d)  any other factor that the division considers appropriate.

(3) (a)  If the division finds that a person has violated, or is violating, this chapter, the division may:

(i)  issue a cease and desist order; and

(ii)  subject to Subsection (3)(b), impose an administrative fine of up to $1,000 for each violation of this chapter.

(b)  Each instance of charging an excessive price under Section 13-41-201 constitutes a separate violation, but in no case shall the administrative fine imposed under Subsection (3)(a) exceed $10,000 per day.

(4)  The division may sue in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce an order under Subsection (3).

(5)  In a suit brought under Subsection (3), if the division prevails, the court may award the division:

(a)  court costs;

(b)  attorney fees; and

(c)  the division's costs incurred in the investigation of the violation of this chapter.

(6)  All money received through an administrative fine imposed, or judgment obtained, under this section shall be deposited in the Consumer Protection Education and Training Fund created by Section 13-2-8.

